Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2051.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 71 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a part to read:PART XXVIIFINANCES OF STATE GOVERNMENTChapter61. (Reserved)63. False Claims Against CommonwealthCHAPTER 61(Reserved)CHAPTER 63FALSE CLAIMS AGAINST COMMONWEALTHSubchapter1234567891011121314151617181920 A. Preliminary Provisions B. False Claims SUBCHAPTER APRELIMINARY PROVISIONSSec.6301. Short title of chapter.6302. Declaration of policy.6303. Definitions.§ 6301. Short title of chapter.This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the Commonwealth Fraud Prevention Act.§ 6302. Declaration of policy.The General Assembly declares that this chapter adopts the intent of the United States Congress in enacting the Federal False Claims Act (Public Law 97-258, 31 U.S.C. § 3729 et seq.).§ 6303. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Claim." As follows:(1) A request or demand for money or property, whether under contract or otherwise and regardless of whether the Commonwealth has title to the money or property, that is presented, submitted or otherwise made to:(i) An employee, officer or agent of the Commonwealth.(ii) A contractor, grantee or other recipient, and any portion of the money or property will be spent or used on the Commonwealth's behalf or to advance a program or interest of the Commonwealth, and the Commonwealth:20250HB2051PN2629 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (A) provides or has provided any portion of the money or property requested or demanded; or(B) will reimburse the contractor, grantee or other recipient for any portion of the money or property which is requested or demanded.(2) The term does not include requests or demands for money or property that the Commonwealth has paid to an individual as compensation for employment or as an income subsidy with no restrictions on the individual's use of the money or property.(3) To the extent it is not connected to a request or demand for money or property, a filing with a Commonwealth agency pursuant to the Commonwealth's insurance laws shall not constitute a claim."Designated district attorney." A district attorney designated by the Attorney General under section 6312(a)(2) (relating to Attorney General investigations and prosecutions and civil actions)."Designee." Any of the following individuals designated by the Attorney General to perform duties under this chapter:(1) An attorney of the Office of Attorney General.(2) A designated district attorney.(3) An attorney from a designated district attorney's office."Knowing" or "knowingly." As follows:(1) When a person, with respect to information, does any of the following:(i) Has actual knowledge of the information.(ii) Acts in deliberate ignorance of the truth or falsity of the information.20250HB2051PN2629 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (iii) Acts in reckless disregard of the truth or falsity of the information.(2) Proof of specific intent to defraud is not required."Legal claim." A claim for relief at law or equity, whether contemplated or asserted, including any claim, demand, account, note or any other cause of action or liability."Material." A natural tendency to influence, or be capable of influencing, the payment or receipt of money or property."Obligation." An established duty, whether or not fixed, arising from any of the following:(1) An express or implied contractual relationship.(2) An express or implied grantor-grantee relationship.(3) An express or implied licensor-licensee relationship.(4) A fee-based or similar relationship.(5) A statute or regulation.(6) The retention of an overpayment."Official use." A use that is consistent with the law and the regulations and policies of the Office of Attorney General, including the following:(1) Use in connection with internal memoranda and reports of the Office of Attorney General or designated district attorney.(2) Communications between the Office of Attorney General or designated district attorney and a Federal, State or local government agency or a contractor of a Federal, State or local government agency, undertaken in furtherance of an investigation or prosecution of an action.(3) Interviews of a qui tam plaintiff or other witness.(4) Oral examinations.20250HB2051PN2629 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (5) Depositions.(6) Preparation for and response to civil discovery requests.(7) Introduction into the record of an action or proceeding.(8) Applications, motions, memoranda and briefs submitted to a court or other tribunal.(9) Communications with investigators, auditors, consultants and experts, the counsel of other parties, arbitrators and mediators, concerning an investigation, action, case or proceeding."Original source." A qui tam plaintiff who:(1) prior to a public disclosure under section 6312(f) (2), has voluntarily disclosed to the Commonwealth the information on which the allegations or transactions in a claim are based; or(2) has knowledge that is independent of and materially adds to the publicly disclosed allegations or transactions and who has voluntarily provided the information to the Commonwealth before filing an action under section 6312(b). " Person. " A natural person, corporation, firm, association, organization, partnership, limited liability company, business, trust, business trust, estate or foundation."Qui tam plaintiff." A person bringing a civil action under section 6312(b). "State." In reference to a jurisdiction, the term includes the District of Columbia, the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, the Virgin Islands and all other insular territories of the United States.SUBCHAPTER B20250HB2051PN2629 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 FALSE CLAIMSSec.6311. Acts subjecting persons to liability and damages.6312. Attorney General investigations and prosecutions and civil actions.6313. Civil investigative demands.6314. Access to and sharing of information. 6315. Deposit of Commonwealth's share of proceeds.6316. Annual report.6317. Statute of limitations, burden of proof and estoppel.6318. Certain rules, policies and agreements prohibited.6319. Relief from retaliatory actions.6320. Actions and remedies under other laws.6321. Qualification of chapter for increased share of recoveries.6322. Rules of procedure.6323. Trial by jury.6324. Implementation.6325. Jurisdiction and Attorney General as relator in false claims act ions. 6326. Expiration.§ 6311. Acts subjecting persons to liability and damages.(a) Liability.--Except as provided in sub section (b), a person shall be liable to the Commonwealth for three times the amount of damages that the Commonwealth sustains, plus a civil penalty in an amount determined under sub section (d) for each violation, if the person commits any of the following acts:(1) Knowingly presents or causes to be presented a false or fraudulent claim for payment or approval.(2) Knowingly makes, uses or causes to be made or used, 20250HB2051PN2629 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 a false record or statement material to a false or fraudulent claim.(3) Has possession, custody or control of property or money used or to be used by the Commonwealth and knowingly delivers or causes to be delivered less than all of the money or property.(4) Is authorized to make or deliver a document certifying receipt of property used or to be used by the Commonwealth and, intending to defraud the Commonwealth, makes or delivers a receipt without completely knowing that the information on the receipt is true.(5) Knowingly buys or receives as a pledge of an obligation or debt, public property from an officer or employee of the Commonwealth who lawfully may not sell or pledge the property.(6) Knowingly makes, uses or causes to be made or used a false record or statement material to an obligation to pay or transmit money or property to the Commonwealth or knowingly conceals, or knowingly and improperly avoids or decreases, an obligation to pay or transmit money or property to the Commonwealth.(7) Knowingly fails to disclose a fact, event or occurrence material to an obligation to pay or transmit money or property to the Commonwealth.(8) Is a beneficiary of an inadvertent submission of a false claim, subsequently discovers the falsity of the claim and fails to disclose the false claim to the Commonwealth within a reasonable time after discovery of the false claim.(9) Conspires to commit a violation of paragraph (1), (2), (3), (4), (5), (6), (7) or (8).20250HB2051PN2629 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (b) Damages limitation.--Notwithstanding the damages provision of sub section (a), the court may assess not less than two times the amount of damages the Commonwealth sustains from a violation of sub section (a) if the court finds all of the following:(1) The person committing the violation furnished the Commonwealth officials who are responsible for investigating false claims violations with all information known to that person about the violation within 30 days after the date on which the person first obtained the information.(2) The person fully cooperated with an investigation by the Commonwealth.(3) At the time the person furnished the Commonwealth with information about the violation, no criminal prosecution, civil action or administrative action had commenced with respect to the violation, and the person did not have actual knowledge of the existence of an investigation into the violation.(c) Commonwealth costs.--A person who is liable for damages or penalties under sub section (a) shall also be liable to the Commonwealth for the reasonable costs of investigating and prosecuting violations of sub section (a), including reasonable costs to the Office of Attorney General and, if applicable, to a designated district attorney under section 6312(a)(2) (relating to Attorney General investigations and prosecutions and civil actions) . (d) Adjustment of penalties.--(1) The upper and lower limits on civil penalties imposed under subsection (b) shall be equal to, and shall adjust consistently with, the civil penalty limits imposed 20250HB2051PN2629 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 under 31 U.S.C. § 3729(a)(1) (relating to false claims), as the limits under that provision are periodically adjusted by the Federal Civil Penalties Inflation Adjustment Act of 1990 (Public Law 101-410, 28 U.S.C. § 2461 note).(2) The Office of Attorney General shall transmit a notice of any adjustment under this subsection to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin.(e) Exemption from disclosure.--The Office of Attorney General and, if applicable, a designated district attorney's office shall be exempt from disclosing information under the act of February 14, 2008 (P.L.6, No.3), known as the Right-to-Know Law, that is furnished under sub section (b) or accessed or shared under section 6314(a) (relating to access to and sharing of information).§ 6312. Attorney General investigations and prosecutions and civil actions.(a) Responsibilities.--(1) The Attorney General shall represent the Commonwealth with respect to all matters arising under this chapter and may investigate a violation of section 6311 (relating to a cts subjecting persons to liability and damages). If the Attorney General finds that a person has violated or is violating section 6311, the Attorney General may bring a civil action under this section against that person for violating section 6311.(2) The Attorney General may enter into an agreement with a district attorney to designate the district attorney to serve as the Attorney General's designee, investigate a violation of section 6311 and bring a civil action under this 20250HB2051PN2629 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 section against a person that has violated or is violating section 6311. The Attorney General at any time may rescind the designation made under this paragraph.(3) Nothing in section 1407 of the act of June 13, 1967 (P.L.31, No.21), known as the Human Services Code, shall be construed to limit the Attorney General's authority to investigate or prosecute violations of section 6311.(b) Action by qui tam plaintiff.--(1) A qui tam plaintiff may bring a civil action for a violation of section 6311 for the qui tam plaintiff and for the Commonwealth in the name of the Commonwealth. Once filed, the action may be dismissed only if the court and the Attorney General give written consent to the dismissal and their reasons for consenting.(2) A copy of the complaint and written disclosure of substantially all material evidence and information the qui tam plaintiff possesses shall be served promptly on the Attorney General as provided for in the Pennsylvania Rules of Civil Procedure or applicable court rule. The complaint shall be filed in camera and shall remain under seal for at least 120 days and shall not be served on the defendant until the court orders the service. The Commonwealth may elect to intervene and proceed with the action within 120 days after the Commonwealth receives the complaint and the material evidence and information.(3) Upon motion of the Commonwealth, the court, for good cause shown, shall extend the time during which the complaint remains sealed under paragraph (2). The motion may be supported by affidavits or other submissions in camera. The defendant shall not be required to respond to a complaint 20250HB2051PN2629 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 filed under this section until the complaint is unsealed and served upon the defendant under the Pennsylvania Rules of Civil Procedure or applicable court rule.(4) Before the expiration of the 120-day period or any extensions obtained under paragraph (3), the Commonwealth shall do either of the following:(i) Proceed with the action.(ii) Notify the court that the Commonwealth declines to take over the action, in which case the qui tam plaintiff shall have the right to conduct the action.(c) Intervention restricted to Commonwealth.--When a qui tam plaintiff brings an action under sub section (b), no person other than the Commonwealth may intervene or bring a related action based on the facts underlying the pending action.(d) Rights of parties to qui tam actions.--(1) If the Commonwealth proceeds with the action, the Commonwealth shall have the primary responsibility for prosecuting the action and shall not be bound by an act of the qui tam plaintiff. The qui tam plaintiff shall have the right to continue as a party to the action, subject to the limitations specified in paragraphs (2), (3), (4) and (5).(2) T he Commonwealth may move to dismiss the action despite the qui tam plaintiff's objections if the Commonwealth notifies the qui tam plaintiff of the filing. The court may dismiss the action if the court has provided the qui tam plaintiff with an opportunity to oppose the motion at a hearing.(3) The Commonwealth may settle the action with the defendant despite the qui tam plaintiff's objections if the court determines, after a hearing, that the proposed 20250HB2051PN2629 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 settlement is fair, adequate and reasonable under the circumstances. Upon a showing of good cause, the hearing may be held in camera. Upon motion of the Commonwealth, the court, for good cause shown, shall order a partial lifting of the seal to facilitate the investigative process or settlement.(4) Upon the Commonwealth's showing that the qui tam plaintiff's unrestricted participation during the course of the action would interfere with or unduly delay the Commonwealth's prosecution of the case or would be repetitious, irrelevant or for purposes of harassment, the court may, in its discretion, impose limitations on the qui tam plaintiff's participation by:(i) limiting the number of witnesses the qui tam plaintiff may call;(ii) limiting the length of witness testimony;(iii) limiting the qui tam plaintiff's cross-examination of witnesses; or(iv) otherwise limiting the qui tam plaintiff's participation in the action.(5) Upon the defendant's showing that the qui tam plaintiff's unrestricted participation in the action would be for purposes of harassment or would cause the defendant undue burden or unnecessary expense, the court may limit the qui tam plaintiff's participation in the action.(6) If the Commonwealth elects not to proceed with the action, the qui tam plaintiff shall have the right to conduct the action. If the Commonwealth requests, the Commonwealth shall be served with copies of all pleadings filed in the action and shall be supplied, at the Commonwealth's expense, 20250HB2051PN2629 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 with copies of all deposition transcripts and other discovery produced in the action. Without limiting the qui tam plaintiff's status and rights, the court shall permit the Commonwealth to intervene at a later date upon a showing of good cause.(7) Whether or not the Commonwealth proceeds with the action, upon the Commonwealth's showing, in camera, that certain actions of discovery by the qui tam plaintiff would interfere with the Commonwealth's investigation or prosecution of a criminal or civil matter arising out of the same facts, the court may stay the discovery for a period of not more than 60 days. The court may extend the 60-day period upon the Commonwealth's further showing, in camera, that the Commonwealth has pursued the criminal or civil investigation or proceedings with reasonable diligence and that the discovery proposed in the civil action will interfere with the ongoing criminal or civil investigations or proceedings.(8) Notwithstanding sub section (b), the Commonwealth may elect to pursue its legal claims through an alternate remedy available to the Commonwealth, including an administrative proceeding to determine a civil money penalty. If the alternate remedy is pursued in another proceeding, the qui tam plaintiff shall have the same rights in the proceeding as if the action had continued under this section . A finding of fact or conclusion of law made in the other proceeding that has become final shall be conclusive on all parties to an action under this section . A finding or conclusion is final if it has been finally determined on appeal to the appropriate court of the Commonwealth, if the time for filing the appeal regarding the finding or conclusion has expired 20250HB2051PN2629 - 13 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 without an appeal having been filed or if the finding or conclusion is not subject to judicial review.(e) Award to qui tam plaintiff.--(1) If the Commonwealth proceeds with an action brought by a qui tam plaintiff, the qui tam plaintiff shall, subject to the provisions of this sub section , receive at least 15% but not more than 25% of the proceeds of the action or settlement of the legal claim, depending upon the extent to which either or both the qui tam plaintiff and the qui tam plaintiff's counsel substantially contributed to the prosecution of the action.(2) If the court finds that the action is based primarily on disclosures of specific information, other than information provided by the qui tam plaintiff, relating to allegations or transactions in a criminal, civil or administrative hearing to which the Commonwealth is a party, or in a Federal, State or local legislative or other governmental hearing, audit or investigation or from the news media, the court may award a sum it considers appropriate, taking into account the information's significance and the qui tam plaintiff's role in advancing the action, but in no case more than 10% of the proceeds of the action or settlement.(3) If the Commonwealth does not proceed with an action under this section , the qui tam plaintiff shall receive at least 25% but not more than 30% of the proceeds of the action or settlement of the legal claim, as the court deems reasonable.(4) Whether or not the Commonwealth proceeds with the action, if the court finds that the qui tam plaintiff planned 20250HB2051PN2629 - 14 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 and initiated the violation of section 6311 upon which the action was brought, the following shall apply:(i) Subject to subparagraph (ii), the court may, to the extent it considers appropriate, reduce the share of the proceeds of the action or settlement of the legal claim which the qui tam plaintiff would otherwise receive under paragraph (1), (2) or (3), taking into account the qui tam plaintiff's role in advancing the action and any relevant circumstances pertaining to the violation.(ii) If the qui tam plaintiff is convicted of criminal conduct arising from the qui tam plaintiff's role in the violation, the qui tam plaintiff shall be dismissed from the civil action and shall not receive a share of the proceeds of the action. The dismissal shall not prejudice the Commonwealth's right to continue the action.(5) An award to a qui tam plaintiff shall be made from the proceeds of the action or settlement of the legal claim. The qui tam plaintiff also shall receive an amount for reasonable expenses which the court finds were necessarily incurred, plus reasonable attorney fees and costs. The expenses, fees and costs shall be awarded against the defendant.(6) If the Commonwealth does not proceed with the action and the qui tam plaintiff conducts the action, the court may award to the defendant reasonable attorney fees and expenses if the defendant prevails in the action and the court finds that the qui tam plaintiff's legal claim was clearly frivolous, clearly vexatious or brought primarily for purposes of harassment.20250HB2051PN2629 - 15 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (f) Certain actions barred.--(1) A court does not have jurisdiction over an action filed under this section against the Governor, the Lieutenant Governor, the Attorney General, the Auditor General, the Treasurer, a cabinet member, a deputy secretary, a member of the General Assembly or a member of the judiciary if the action is based on evidence or information known to the Commonwealth when the action was brought.(2) Subject to paragraph (3), the court shall dismiss an action or legal claim brought under sub section (b) if substantially the same allegations or transactions alleged in the action or legal claim were publicly disclosed in:(i) the news media;(ii) a criminal, civil or administrative hearing in which the Commonwealth is or was a party; or(iii) a Federal, State or local legislative or other governmental hearing, report, audit or investigation.(3) The court may not dismiss an action under paragraph (2) if:(i) the Attorney General or a designated district attorney brought action;(ii) the Commonwealth opposes dismissal; or(iii) the qui tam plaintiff is an original source of the information publicly disclosed.(4) A qui tam plaintiff may not bring an action under this section which is based upon allegations or transactions that are the subject of a civil suit or an administrative civil money penalty proceeding in which the Commonwealth is already a party.(g) Commonwealth not liable for certain expenses.--The 20250HB2051PN2629 - 16 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Commonwealth is not liable for expenses that a qui tam plaintiff incurs in bringing an action under this section . (h) (Reserved).(i) Cooperation by agencies.--Commonwealth agencies shall cooperate in the investigation and prosecution of false claims under this section , whether the investigation is conducted or a suit is brought by the Attorney General, a designated district attorney or a qui tam plaintiff.(j) Nature of action.--An action under this section is an action brought by the Commonwealth, as provided in section 204(c) of the act of October 15, 1980 (P.L.950, No.164), known as the Commonwealth Attorneys Act.§ 6313. Civil investigative demands.(a) Issuance and service.--(1) If the Attorney General or, for purposes of this sub section , the Attorney General's designee, has reason to believe that a person may be in possession, custody or control of documentary material or information relevant to a false claims investigation under this chapter , the Attorney General or designee may, before commencing a civil action under section 6312(a) (relating to Attorney General investigations and prosecutions and civil actions) or making an election whether to intervene in an action brought under section 6312(b), issue in writing and cause to be served upon the person a civil investigative demand requiring the person to:(i) produce documentary material for inspection and copying;(ii) answer in writing written interrogatories with respect to documentary material or information;20250HB2051PN2629 - 17 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (iii) give oral testimony concerning documentary material or information; or(iv) furnish any combination of materials, answers or testimony.(2) If a civil investigative demand is an express demand for a product of discovery, the Attorney General or designee shall:(i) Cause to be served in any manner authorized by this sub section a copy of the demand upon the person from whom or which the discovery was obtained.(ii) Notify the demand issuee of the date on which the copy was served.(b) Contents and deadlines.--(1) A civil investigative demand shall state the nature of the conduct constituting the alleged violation of this chapter that is under investigation and the applicable provisions of this chapter alleged to be violated. (2) If the civil investigative demand is for the production of documentary material, the demand shall:(i) Describe each class of documentary material to be produced with definiteness and certainty as to permit the material to be fairly identified.(ii) Prescribe a return date for each class that will provide a reasonable time period within which the material so demanded may be assembled and made available for inspection and copying.(iii) Identify the false claims investigator to whom the material shall be available.(3) If the civil investigative demand is for answers to written interrogatories, the demand shall:20250HB2051PN2629 - 18 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (i) Describe with specificity the written interrogatories to be answered.(ii) Prescribe dates on which the answers to the written interrogatories shall be submitted.(iii) Identify the false claims investigator to whom the answers shall be submitted.(4) If the civil investigative demand is for oral testimony, the demand shall:(i) Prescribe a date, time and place at which the oral testimony shall be given.(ii) Identify a false claims investigator who shall conduct the examination and the custodian to whom the transcript of the examination shall be submitted.(iii) Specify that attendance and testimony are necessary to the conduct of the false claims investigation.(iv) Describe the general purpose for which the demand is being issued and general nature of the testimony, including the primary areas of inquiry, which will be taken under the demand.(5) A civil investigative demand shall contain the following statement printed at the beginning of the demand: "You have the right to seek the assistance of an attorney, who may represent you in all phases of the investigation of which this civil investigative demand is a part."(6) A civil investigative demand that is an express demand for a product of discovery shall not be returned or returnable until 20 days after a copy of the demand has been served upon the person from whom or which the discovery was obtained.20250HB2051PN2629 - 19 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (7) The date prescribed for commencement of oral testimony under a civil investigative demand shall not be less than seven days after the date on which the demand is served, unless the Attorney General or designee determines that exceptional circumstances exist and warrant commencing testimony within a lesser time period.(8) The Attorney General, or designee, may not authorize the issuance of more than one civil investigative demand for the same person's oral testimony unless:(i) the person requests otherwise; or(ii) the Attorney General or designee notifies the person in writing that an additional demand for oral testimony is necessary.(c) Protected material or information.--(1) A civil investigative demand may not require the production of documentary material, the submission of answers to written interrogatories or the giving of oral testimony if the material, answers or testimony would be protected from disclosure under the standards applicable to:(i) subpoenas or subpoenas duces tecum issued by a court of this Commonwealth to aid in a grand jury investigation; or(ii) discovery under the Pennsylvania Rules of Civil Procedure or other applicable court rule, to the extent that the application of the standards to a demand is appropriate and consistent with the provisions and purposes of this section . (2) Except if a statute explicitly precludes the superseding effect imposed by this paragraph, a civil investigative demand that is an express demand for a product 20250HB2051PN2629 - 20 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 of discovery supersedes an inconsistent order, rule or provision of law, other than in this section , that prevents or restrains disclosure of the product of discovery to any person.(3) A person's disclosure of a product of discovery under an express demand does not constitute a waiver of any right or privilege to resist discovery of trial preparation materials that the person may be entitled to invoke.(d) Service and jurisdiction.--Except as otherwise provided, the following apply to civil investigative demands issued under this section and petitions filed under sub section (j): (1) A civil investigative demand may be served by a false claims investigator, a law enforcement officer or another individual authorized by law to serve process in the jurisdiction where the demand is served.(2) A petition may be served by any person authorized to serve process under the Pennsylvania Rules of Civil Procedure or other applicable court rule.(3) A civil investigative demand or petition may be served upon a person consistent with and in the manner prescribed by 42 Pa.C.S. Ch. 53 (relating to bases of jurisdiction and interstate and international procedure) and the Pennsylvania Rules of Civil Procedure or other applicable court rule, for personal service inside or outside this Commonwealth.(4) To the extent that the courts of this Commonwealth can assert jurisdiction over a person outside this Commonwealth, a court with jurisdiction over an action filed under this chapter shall have the same jurisdiction to take action respecting the person's compliance with this section 20250HB2051PN2629 - 21 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 that it would have if the person resided within the court's jurisdiction.(5) A civil investigative demand or petition may be served upon a legal entity by:(i) delivering an executed copy of the demand or petition to a partner, executive officer, managing agent or general agent of the legal entity, or to an employee designated or agent authorized by appointment or law to receive service of process on behalf of the legal entity;(ii) delivering an executed copy of the demand or petition to the legal entity's principal office or place of business;(iii) depositing an executed copy of the demand or petition in the United States mail by registered or certified mail with a return receipt requested, addressed to the legal entity at its principal office or place of business; or(iv) any other method provided by the Pennsylvania Rules of Civil Procedure or other applicable court rule.(6) A civil investigative demand or petition may be served upon a natural person by:(i) delivering an executed copy of the demand or petition to the person;(ii) depositing an executed copy of the demand or petition in the United States mail by registered or certified mail with a return receipt requested, addressed to the person at the person's residence or principal office or place of business; or(iii) any other method provided by the Pennsylvania Rules of Civil Procedure or other applicable court rule.20250HB2051PN2629 - 22 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (7) A verified return by the individual serving a civil investigative demand or a petition, specifying the manner of service, shall be proof of service. In the case of service by registered or certified mail, the return post office receipt of the demand or petition's delivery shall accompany the verified return.(e) Documentary material.--(1) The production of documentary material shall be made under a written and verified certificate, in the form a civil investigative demand designates:(i) if the demand issuee is a natural person, by the demand issuee; or(ii) if the demand issuee is not a natural person, by an individual who has knowledge of facts and circumstances relating to the production and is authorized to act on the demand issuee's behalf.(2) The certificate shall state that all the documentary material required by the demand and in the demand issuee's possession, custody or control has been produced and made available to the false claims investigator identified in the demand.(3) A demand issuee shall make demanded material available for inspection and copying to the false claims investigator identified in the demand:(i) at the demand issuee's principal place of business;(ii) at another place as the false claims investigator and the demand issuee thereafter may agree and prescribe in writing; or(iii) as the court may direct under this section . 20250HB2051PN2629 - 23 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (4) The documentary material shall be made available on the return date specified in the demand or on a later date as the false claims investigator may prescribe in writing. The demand issuee may, upon written agreement with the false claims investigator, substitute copies for originals of all or any part of the material.(5) If the demand issuee objects to the production of any portion of the required documentary material or otherwise withholds any portion of the material, the demand issuee shall with particularity state the reasons for the objection or withholding and identify all withheld material. (f) Interrogatories.--(1) Each interrogatory in a civil investigative demand shall be answered separately and fully in writing under oath and shall be submitted under a verified certificate, in the form the demand designates, stating that all information required by the demand and in the demand issuee's possession, custody, control or knowledge has been submitted:(i) if the demand issuee is a natural person, by the demand issuee; or(ii) if the demand issuee is not a natural person, by the individuals responsible for answering each interrogatory.(2) If the demand issuee objects to an interrogatory or any portion of an interrogatory, or otherwise withholds information, the demand issuee shall state with particularity the reasons for the objection or withholding and identify all withheld information.(g) Oral examinations.--(1) The examination of a person under a civil 20250HB2051PN2629 - 24 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 investigative demand for oral testimony shall be taken before an officer authorized to administer oaths and affirmations by the laws of this Commonwealth or of the place where the examination is held.(2) The officer shall put the witness on oath or affirmation and, personally or by someone acting under the officer's direction and in the officer's presence, shall record the witness's testimony.(3) The testimony shall be stenographically transcribed.(4) When the transcribing is complete, the officer shall promptly transmit a copy of the transcript to the custodian.(5) This sub section shall not preclude the taking of testimony by any means authorized by, and in a manner consistent with, the Pennsylvania Rules of Civil Procedure or other applicable court rule.(6) The false claims investigator conducting the examination shall exclude from the place where the examination is held all persons except the following:(i) The person giving the testimony.(ii) The attorney for the person giving the testimony.(iii) An attorney for the Commonwealth.(iv) The officer before whom the testimony is to be taken.(v) The court reporter taking the testimony.(vi) The custodian, if identified in the demand as attending.(vii) Any other person upon which the person giving the testimony agreed and the attorney for the Commonwealth.20250HB2051PN2629 - 25 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (7) A person's oral testimony taken under a civil investigative demand shall be taken in the county or city within which the person resides, is found or transacts business, or in a place to which the false claims investigator and the person otherwise agree.(8) When the transcript of testimony is completed, the false claims investigator or the officer before whom the testimony is taken shall afford the witness, who may be accompanied by counsel, a reasonable opportunity to examine and read the transcript, unless the witness waives the reading and examination.(9) The officer or false claims investigator shall enter and identify on the transcript any changes in form or substance that the witness desires to make with a statement of the reasons the witness gives for making the changes.(10) The witness shall sign the transcript after the changes, if any, are made, unless the witness waives the signing in writing, is ill, cannot be found or refuses to sign. If the witness does not sign the transcript within 30 days after being afforded a reasonable opportunity to sign it, the officer or false claims investigator shall sign the transcript and state on the record the fact of the witness's waiver, illness, absence or refusal to sign, together with the reasons, if any, given for why the witness did not sign the transcript.(11) The officer before whom the testimony is taken shall certify on the transcript that the witness was sworn by the officer and the transcript is a true record of the witness's testimony, and the officer shall promptly deliver the transcript or send the transcript by registered or 20250HB2051PN2629 - 26 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 certified mail to the custodian.(12) Upon receiving payment of reasonable charges, the false claims investigator shall furnish a copy of the transcript to the witness only, except that the Attorney General or the Attorney General's designee may, for good cause, limit the witnesses to inspecting the official transcript.(13) A person compelled to appear for oral testimony may be accompanied, represented and advised by counsel. Counsel may advise the person in confidence with respect to any question asked of the person.(14) The person or the person's counsel may object on the record to any question, in whole or in part, and shall briefly state for the record the reason for the objection. An objection may be made, received and entered upon the record when it is asserted that the person is entitled to refuse to answer on the grounds of a constitutional or legal right or privilege, including the privilege against self-incrimination. The person may not otherwise object to or refuse to answer any question and may not directly or through counsel otherwise interrupt the oral examination. If a person refuses to answer a question, a petition may be filed with the court under this section for an order compelling the person to answer the question.(15) A person appearing for oral testimony under a civil investigative demand shall be entitled to the same fees and allowances that are paid to witnesses in the courts of common pleas.(h) Refusal to comply on self-incrimination privilege grounds.--The Attorney General or, with the Attorney General's 20250HB2051PN2629 - 27 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 authorization, a designated district attorney may invoke the provisions of 42 Pa.C.S. § 5947 (relating to immunity of witnesses) if a person, on the grounds of privilege against self-incrimination, refuses to:(1) furnish documentary material in response to a civil investigative demand;(2) answer an interrogatory in response to a civil investigative demand;(3) answer a question asked during oral examination made under a civil investigative demand; or(4) otherwise comply with a civil investigative demand.(i) Custody of documents, answers and transcripts.--(1) Unless the Attorney General or, if applicable, a designated district attorney designates another person, the false claims investigator identified on a civil investigative demand shall serve as custodian of documentary material, interrogatory answers and oral testimony transcripts received under this section . The Attorney General or, if applicable, a designated district attorney may designate additional persons as the Attorney General determines to be necessary to serve as deputy, alternative or successor custodians.(2) A false claims investigator who receives documentary material, interrogatory answers or oral testimony transcripts under this section shall: ( i ) if serving as custodian, take possession of the material, answers or transcripts and be responsible for their usage and for the return of documentary material; or( ii ) if not serving as custodian, transmit the materials, answers or transcripts to the custodian, who 20250HB2051PN2629 - 28 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 shall take possession and responsibility for the materials, answers or transcripts.(3) The custodian may cause the preparation of copies of documentary material, interrogatory answers or oral testimony transcripts as may be required for official use by a false claims investigator or another officer or employee of the Office of Attorney General authorized to use the materials, answers or transcripts in connection with the taking of oral testimony under this section . (4) Under reasonable terms and conditions as the Attorney General, or a designated district attorney authorized by the Attorney General, prescribes, a custodian possessing documentary material, interrogatory answers or oral testimony transcripts shall make the material, answers and transcripts available for examination by the person that produced them or by the person's representative.(5) Notwithstanding 18 Pa.C.S. Ch. 91 (relating to criminal history record information), a designee who is designated or called to appear before a court, grand jury or Commonwealth agency in a case or proceeding may, in connection with the case or proceeding, obtain from the custodian and use any documentary material, interrogatory answers or oral testimony transcripts that the designee determines is required.(6) Upon the case or proceeding's completion, an attorney shall return to the custodian documentary material, interrogatory answers or oral testimony transcripts that have not passed into the court's, grand jury's or agency's control through introduction into the case or proceeding's record.(7) Subject to paragraphs (8) and (9), upon the written 20250HB2051PN2629 - 29 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 request of a person that produced documentary material in connection with a false claims investigation, the custodian shall return the material.(8) The custodian shall return the material only if:(i) all cases or proceedings arising out of the false claims investigation have been completed; or(ii) no case or proceeding in which the material may be used has been commenced within a reasonable time after completion of the examination and analysis of all documentary material and other information assembled in the course of the false claims investigation.(9) The custodian shall not be required to return either of the following:(i) material that has passed into a court, grand jury or Commonwealth agency's control through introduction into a case or proceeding's record; or(ii) copies furnished to the false claims investigator or made for the Attorney General, or designee, under this sub section . (j) Judicial proceedings.--(1) The Commonwealth may file and serve upon a person a petition for a court order enforcing a civil investigative demand if:(i) the person fails to comply with a demand served upon the person; or(ii) satisfactory copying or reproduction of the material requested in the demand cannot be done and the person refuses to surrender the material.(2) A demand issuee who has received a civil investigative demand may file and serve upon the false claims 20250HB2051PN2629 - 30 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 investigator identified in the demand a petition for a court order modifying or setting aside the demand.(3) If a demand is an express demand for a product of discovery, the person from whom discovery was obtained may, upon receipt of the demand, file and serve upon the false claims investigator identified in the demand a petition for a court order modifying or setting aside those portions of the demand requiring production of the product of discovery.(4) A petition under paragraph (2) must be filed within:(i) the earlier of 20 days after the civil investigative demand is served on the person or any time before the return date specified in the demand; or(ii) a longer period if the false claims investigator so prescribes in writing in the demand.(5) A petition under paragraph (2) shall specify each ground the petitioner relies on in seeking relief and may be based on either of the following:(i) failure of the civil investigative demand, or any portion thereof , to comply with this section 's provisions; or(ii) a constitutional or other legal right or privilege of the petitioner.(6) During the pendency of a petition under paragraph (2), the following shall apply:(i) The court may stay, as the court deems proper, compliance with all or part of the demand and the running of time allowed for compliance with the demand.(ii) The petitioner must comply with any portion of the demand that is not sought to be modified or set aside, or otherwise subject to a stay issued by the 20250HB2051PN2629 - 31 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 court.(7) At any time a custodian possesses or is in custody or control of documentary material, interrogatory answers or transcripts of oral testimony given under a civil investigative demand, the following persons may file and serve upon the custodian a petition for a court order requiring the custodian to perform a duty imposed on the custodian by this section : (i) the demand issuee that furnished the material, answers or testimony; or(ii) in the case of an express demand for a product of discovery, the person from whom discovery was obtained.(8) The court shall have jurisdiction to hear and determine a petition filed under this section and, after a hearing at which all parties have the opportunity to be heard, to enter orders as may be required to carry out the provisions of this section . (9) A final order entered by Commonwealth Court under this section shall be subject to appeal to the Supreme Court under 42 Pa.C.S. § 723(a) (relating to appeals from Commonwealth Court).(k) Exemption from disclosure.--The Office of Attorney General and, if applicable, a designated district attorney's office, shall be exempt from disclosing under the act of February 14, 2008 (P.L.6, No.3), known as the Right-to-Know Law, documentary material, interrogatory answers and oral testimony provided under a civil investigative demand.(l) Definitions.--For purposes of this section , the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to 20250HB2051PN2629 - 32 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 them in this sub section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Custodian." The false claims investigator or other custodian or a deputy or alternate custodian designated by the Attorney General under sub section (i). "Demand issuee." A person to whom or which a civil investigative demand is issued or directed."Documentary material." Includes the original or a copy of a book, record, report, memorandum, paper, communication, tabulation, chart or other document or data compilation stored or accessible through computer or other information retrieval systems, together with appropriate and succinct instructions and all other materials necessary to use or interpret the data compilations, and a product of discovery."False claims investigation." An inquiry conducted by a false claims investigator for the purposes of ascertaining whether a person is or has been engaged in a violation of this chapter . "False claims investigator." An individual charged with the duty of enforcing or carrying out the provisions of this chapter who is:(1) an attorney or investigator employed by the Office of Attorney General or, if applicable, by a designated district attorney; or(2) an officer or employee of the Commonwealth acting under the attorney or investigator's direction and supervision in connection with a false claims investigation."Legal entity." A person other than a natural person."Person." As defined in 1 Pa.C.S. § 1991 (relating to definitions).20250HB2051PN2629 - 33 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Product of discovery." The term includes:(1) the original or duplicate of a deposition interrogatory, document, thing, result of the inspection of land or other property, examination or admission that is obtained by any method of discovery in a judicial or administrative proceeding of an adversarial nature;(2) a digest, analysis, selection, compilation or derivation of an item listed in paragraph (1); and(3) an index or other manner of access to an item listed in paragraph (1)."Verified." Supported by oath or affirmation and averred subject to the penalties of 18 Pa.C.S. § 4904 (relating to unsworn falsification to authorities).§ 6314. Access to and sharing of information. (a) Criminal information.--(1) Subject to paragraph (2) and section 6324 (relating to implementation), and as necessary for official use, the provisions of 18 Pa.C.S. Ch. 91 (relating to criminal history record information) shall not impair the ability of the Attorney General to access and share data, records, documents or other information obtained during the course of a criminal investigation or prosecution with the following:(i) A section, unit, subunit or individual employee or agent of the Office of Attorney General authorized by the Attorney General to enforce this chapter, including a designated district attorney.(ii) An official of the United States, other states, the Commonwealth or a political subdivision thereof charged with the responsibility for enforcing Federal, state or local laws respecting fraud or false claims upon 20250HB2051PN2629 - 34 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Federal, state or local governments.(iii) A qui tam plaintiff.(2) A recipient under paragraph (1) who is subject to the jurisdiction of the Commonwealth shall be subject to the provisions of 18 Pa.C.S. Ch. 91 relating to further disclosure, dissemination and sharing of the information with noncriminal justice agencies, departments and individuals, except as permitted under paragraph (1).(b) Civil investigative information.--(1) Except as otherwise provided in this section or section 6313 (relating to civil investigative demands), and as necessary for official use, documentary material, interrogatory answers and oral testimony transcripts or copies of the foregoing may not be accessed by, shared with or made available for examination by an individual other than a false claims investigator or other officer or employee of the Office of Attorney General or, if applicable, of a designated district attorney.(2) The prohibition in paragraph (1) shall not apply if the person that produced the material, answers or transcripts, or, in the case of a product of discovery produced under an express demand for the material, the person from whom or which the discovery is obtained, consents.(3) Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to prevent disclosure to the General Assembly, or a committee or subcommittee thereof, or to a Commonwealth agency for the agency's use in furtherance of its statutory or constitutional responsibilities, except that disclosure shall be subject to 18 Pa.C.S. Ch. 91.(4) Except as otherwise prohibited by law, the Attorney 20250HB2051PN2629 - 35 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 General or, with the Attorney General's authorization, a designee, may share information obtained under section 6311 (relating to acts subjecting persons to liability and damages) with a qui tam plaintiff, if the Attorney General or authorized designee determines it is necessary as part of a false claims investigation or action conducted under this article.§ 6315. Deposit of Commonwealth's share of proceeds.(a) Distribution and division.--The Commonwealth's share of the proceeds of an action or settlement under this chapter, not including the enforcement costs and less any amount legally required to be paid from the Commonwealth's share, shall be distributed in the following manner:(1) An amount equal to 20% of the total enforcement costs shall be distributed from the Commonwealth's share to the Office of Attorney General and, if applicable, to a designated district attorney, in proportions equal to each office's percentage of the enforcement costs.(2) After distribution under paragraph (1), the remainder of the Commonwealth's share shall be distributed to the Commonwealth agencies that sustained damages from the violation of section 6311 (relating to acts subjecting persons to liability and damages) in proportions equal to each agency's percentage of the damages. A Commonwealth agency that has distributed money under this paragraph shall use the money to reimburse the agency-administered programs whose funds were diminished because of the violation.(b) Definition.--As used in this section, the term "enforcement costs" means the costs awarded under section 6311(d) to the Attorney General and, if applicable, to a 20250HB2051PN2629 - 36 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 designated district attorney.§ 6316. Annual report.(a) Report required.--The Attorney General shall prepare an annual report concerning actions taken under this chapter by December 31 each year, beginning December 31, 2025. The report shall be submitted to the following:(1) The Governor.(2) The Department of Auditor General.(3) The Independent Fiscal Office.(4) The Office of Inspector General.(5) The members of the General Assembly.(6) The Legislative Budget and Finance Committee.(b) Contents.--The report shall include the following:(1) The number of actions filed under this chapter by the Attorney General.(2) The number of actions filed under this chapter by the Attorney General that were completed.(3) The amount that was recovered in actions filed under this chapter by the Attorney General through settlement or through a judgment and, if known, the amount recovered for damages, penalties and litigation costs.(4) The number of actions filed under section 6312 (relating to Attorney General investigations and prosecutions and civil actions) by a person other than the Attorney General.(5) The number of actions filed under section 6312 by a person other than the Attorney General that were completed.(6) The amounts that were recovered in actions filed under section 6312 by a person other than the Attorney General through settlement or through a judgment and, if 20250HB2051PN2629 - 37 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 known, the amounts recovered for damages, penalties and litigation costs and the amounts recovered by the Commonwealth and the person.(7) The amount expended by the Commonwealth for investigation, litigation and all other costs for legal claims under this chapter . (8) A narrative describing the most notable or prevalent violations of section 6311 (relating to acts subjecting persons to liability and damages) and recommendations on how Commonwealth agencies may prevent similar violations from occurring.(9) Legislative recommendations the Attorney General may have for amendments to this chapter and any other law as it relates to this chapter . § 6317. Statute of limitations, burden of proof and estoppel.(a) Statute of limitations.--(1) Subject to paragraph (2), a civil action under section 6312 (relating to Attorney General investigations and prosecutions and civil actions) may not be brought more than 10 years after the date on which the violation was committed.(2) If a violation is part of a continuing course of conduct, a civil action under section 6312 may not be brought more than 10 years after the date on which the last violation in the continuing course of conduct was committed.(3) If the Commonwealth elects to intervene and proceed with an action brought under section 6312(b), the following shall apply:(i) The Commonwealth may file its own complaint or amend the qui tam plaintiff's complaint in order to clarify or add detail to the legal claims and add any 20250HB2051PN2629 - 38 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 additional legal claims with respect to which the Commonwealth contends that the Commonwealth is entitled to relief.(ii) The Commonwealth's pleading shall relate back to the filing date of the qui tam plaintiff's complaint to the extent that the Commonwealth's legal claims arise out of the conduct, transactions or occurrences specified , or attempted to be specified , in the qui tam plaintiff's complaint.(b) Burden of proof.--In an action brought under section 6312, the Commonwealth or the qui tam plaintiff shall be required to prove all essential elements of the cause of action, including damages, by a preponderance of the evidence.(c) Estoppel.--Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a final judgment rendered in the Commonwealth's favor in a criminal proceeding charging false statements or fraud, whether upon a verdict after trial or upon a plea of guilty or nolo contendere, shall estop the defendant from denying the essential elements of the offense in an action brought under section 6312 that involves the same transaction as in the criminal proceeding.§ 6318. Certain rules, policies and agreements prohibited.(a) Prohibitions on employer.--An employer may not:(1) make, adopt or enforce a rule, regulation or policy preventing an employee, contractor or agent from disclosing information to a government agency or law enforcement agency related to, or from acting to stop, a violation of section 6311 (relating to acts subjecting persons to liability and damages); or(2) require, as a condition of employment, during the 20250HB2051PN2629 - 39 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 term of employment or at or upon the termination of employment, that an employee, contractor or agent agree to, accept or execute an agreement that limits or denies the employee, contractor or agent's ability to: (i) disclose to a government agency or law enforcement agency information related to an alleged or actual violation of section 6311; or(ii) bring an action under section 6312(b) (relating to Attorney General investigations and prosecutions and civil actions) or 6319(b) (relating to relief from retaliatory actions).(b) Void effect.--A rule, regulation, policy or agreement that violates subsection (a) is void to the extent of the violation.(c) Construction.--Subsection (a)(2)(ii) shall not be construed to prohibit, as a term of good-faith settlement of a disputed legal claim, the release and discharge of an employee, contractor or agent's legal claim under section 6319.§ 6319. Relief from retaliatory actions.(a) Relief.--An employee, contractor or agent shall be entitled to all relief necessary to make the employee, contractor or agent whole, if the employee, contractor or agent is discharged, demoted, suspended, threatened, harassed or in any other manner discriminated against in the terms and conditions of employment, contract or agency because of lawful acts done by the employee, contractor, agent or associated others in furtherance of an action under this chapter or other efforts to stop a violation of this chapter . (b) Relief.--Relief under sub section (a) shall include reinstatement with the same seniority status that the employee, 20250HB2051PN2629 - 40 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 contractor or agent would have had but for the discrimination, two times the amount of back pay, interest on the back pay and compensation for special damages sustained as a result of the discrimination, including litigation costs and reasonable attorney fees.(c) Burden of proof.--In an action under this section, the plaintiff must prove all essential elements of the cause of action, including damages, by a preponderance of the evidence. (d) Limitation.--An action under this section may not be brought more than three years after the date on which the retaliation occurred.§ 6320. Actions and remedies under other laws.(a) Actions and remedies not exclusive.--The provisions of this chapter are not exclusive and the actions and remedies provided for in this chapter shall be in addition to any other actions and remedies provided for in any other law or available under the common law.(b) Construction.--The availability of an action or remedy provided for in any other law or available under the common law shall not be construed to exclude, impair or limit the availability or use of the provisions of this chapter . (c) Existing privileges and immunities unaffected.-- This chapter shall not abrogate or modify any existing statutory or common law privilege or immunity.§ 6321. Qualification of chapter for increased share of recoveries.(a) Submission.--Within 30 days after the effective date of this sub section , the Attorney General shall submit a copy of this chapter and any other relevant information to the Office of Inspector General, United States Department of Health and Human 20250HB2051PN2629 - 41 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Services and request a determination that this chapter meets the requirements of section 1909(b) of the Social Security Act of 1935 (49 Stat. 620, 42 U.S.C. § 1396h(b)) (relating to State false claims act requirements for increased State share of recoveries), in order to qualify the Commonwealth for an increased share of amounts recovered under this chapter with respect to false or fraudulent claims submitted to the medical assistance program.(b) Review and recommendations.--If the Office of Inspector General, United States Department of Health and Human Services determines that this chapter does not meet the requirements of section 1909(b) of the Social Security Act of 1935, the Attorney General shall prepare and transmit to the officials designated in section 6316 (relating to annual report), a report explaining the reasons for the denial and suggested revisions to this chapter which would cause this chapter to meet the requirements of section 1909(b) of the Social Security Act of 1935.§ 6322. Rules of procedure.Except as otherwise specified in, or where clearly inconsistent with, this chapter , original proceedings under this chapter shall be governed by the Pennsylvania Rules of Civil Procedure or other applicable court rule.§ 6323. Trial by jury.A party to an action under this chapter shall be entitled to trial by jury.§ 6324. Implementation.(a) Regulations.--The Attorney General may promulgate regulations as necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter.(b) Temporary regulations.--20250HB2051PN2629 - 42 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) In order to facilitate the speedy implementation of this chapter, the Attorney General may adopt temporary regulations within three years after the effective date of this section. A temporary regulation promulgated under this section shall not be subject to review under any of the following:(i) Section 612 of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.177, No.175), known as The Administrative Code of 1929.(ii) Sections 201, 202, 203, 204 and 205 of the act of July 31, 1968 (P.L.769, No.240), referred to as the Commonwealth Documents Law.(iii) Sections 204(b) and 301(10) of the act of October 15, 1980 (P.L.950, No.164), known as the Commonwealth Attorneys Act.(iv) The act of June 25, 1982 (P.L.633, No.181), known as the Regulatory Review Act.(2) The Attorney General may adopt necessary amendments to a temporary regulation at any time before the temporary regulation's expiration.(3) The Attorney General shall transmit temporary regulations and amendments to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin.(4) A temporary regulation or amendment shall take effect upon transmission to the Legislative Reference Bureau, unless the Attorney General designates a later date.(5) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (2), temporary regulations and amendments shall expire the earlier of three years after the effective date of this section, or a 20250HB2051PN2629 - 43 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 date the Attorney General designates.(6) At any time before a temporary regulation expires under paragraph (5), the Attorney General may promulgate a final version of the temporary regulation, in which case the temporary regulation shall expire when the final version takes effect, is finally disapproved or is withdrawn by the Attorney General.(c) Mandatory provisions.--The Attorney General, whether by regulation or policy, shall implement provisions to:(1) Control a person's disclosure, dissemination, sharing or use of information that is protected under 18 Pa.C.S. Ch. 91 (relating to criminal history record information) and that the person lawfully obtains in connection with the enforcement of section 6311 (relating to acts subjecting persons to liability and damages).(2) In accordance with section 6313 (relating to civil investigative demands), prevent unauthorized further disclosure, dissemination, sharing or use of protected information.(d) Construction.--This section is not intended to impair the Attorney General's discretion to adopt policies as necessary to implement this chapter.§ 6325. Jurisdiction and Attorney General as relator in false claims act ions. (a) Jurisdiction.--An action or petition under this chapter shall be filed in a court of competent jurisdiction. The following shall apply:(1) Commonwealth Court shall have original jurisdiction of an action under section 6312 (relating to Attorney General investigations and prosecutions and civil actions) or 20250HB2051PN2629 - 44 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 petition under section 6313 (relating to civil investigative demands). The courts of common pleas shall have original jurisdiction of any action under section 6319 (relating to relief from retaliatory actions).(2) A court exercising jurisdiction of an action under this chapter shall have ancillary jurisdiction over a legal claim asserted under the laws of the United States or a state or local government which arises from the same transaction or occurrence . (b) Attorney General as relator.--To the extent permitted by Federal law the Attorney General may bring an action as a relator under 31 U.S.C. § 3730 (relating to civil actions for false claims) with respect to any act for which a person may be held liable under 31 U.S.C. Ch. 37 (relating to claims). (c) Service on other authorities.--With respect to the Federal Government or a state or local government that is named as a coplaintiff with the Commonwealth in an action brought under this chapter , the following shall apply to a seal on the action ordered by the court under section 6312(b): (1) The seal shall not preclude the Commonwealth or the qui tam plaintiff from:(i) serving the complaint or other pleadings or filings upon officials who are charged with the responsibility of enforcing the law of that Federal, State or local government respecting fraud or false claims upon the Federal Government; or(ii) disclosing to the officials substantially all material evidence and information the Commonwealth or the qui tam plaintiff possesses.(2) The seal shall apply to the officials so served to 20250HB2051PN2629 - 45 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the same extent as the seal applies to other parties in the action.(d) Definition.--For purposes of this section , the term "state" includes the District of Columbia, the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, the Virgin Islands and all insular territories of the United States.§ 6326. Expiration.(a) General rule.--Except as provided in paragraph (2), this chapter shall expire 20 years after the effective date of this section . (b) Exception.--The expiration of this chapter shall not apply to or otherwise affect the following:(1) A violation of this chapter that occurred before the expiration date.(2) An investigation of an alleged violation of this chapter that commenced, but was not completed, before the expiration date.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB2051PN2629 - 46 - 123456789101112131415161718